Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 10

Miscellaneous

48-249-1001. Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The general assembly has the power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time, and all domestic and foreign LLCs subject to this chapter shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1002. Applicability — Savings clause.

Effective date; Savings clause.

This chapter applies to:

Every domestic LLC formed on or after January 1, 2006;

Any domestic LLC that was formed prior to January 1, 2006, and that has elected to be governed by this chapter pursuant to subsection (b); and

The outstanding and future interests in the respective domestic LLCs described in subdivisions (a)(1)(A) and (B).

If there are other specific statutory provisions that govern the formation of, impose restrictions or requirements on, confer special powers, privileges or authorities on or fix special procedures or methods for special categories of LLCs, then, to the extent such provisions are inconsistent with or different from this chapter, such provisions shall prevail.

Voluntary election by pre-2006 LLCs. On or after January 1, 2006, a domestic LLC formed prior to January 1, 2006, under the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act, compiled in chapters 201-248 of this title, may voluntarily elect to be governed by this chapter by amending its articles of organization to include the statement “This LLC elects to be governed by the Tennessee Revised Limited Liability Company Act,” or a statement of like import. Such election and amendment to the articles of organization shall be approved by consent of all the members of the domestic LLC.

Governance of pre-2006 LLCs. Any domestic LLC that was formed prior to January 1, 2006, under the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act, and that does not voluntarily elect to be governed by this chapter pursuant to subsection (b), shall continue to be governed by the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act, compiled in chapters 201-248 of this title.

Foreign LLCs. This chapter applies to every foreign LLC that first files an application for a certificate of authority on or after January 1, 2006, to every foreign LLC that registers a name in this state on or after January 1, 2006, and to every foreign LLC that has registered a name in this state prior to January 1, 2006, pursuant to the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act. With respect to each foreign LLC that first filed an application for a certificate of authority prior to January 1, 2006, the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act shall apply to such foreign LLC until the due date of the first annual report required to be filed by such foreign LLC on or after January 1, 2006, after which due date this chapter shall apply to such foreign LLC, except that such foreign LLC shall not be required to obtain a new certificate of authority.

Pre-2006 proceeding preserved. This chapter does not affect an action or proceeding commenced, or right accrued, under the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, §§ 50, 51.

48-249-1003. LLC tax classification.

For purposes of all state and local Tennessee taxes, a domestic or foreign LLC shall be treated as a partnership or an association taxable as a corporation, as such classification is determined for federal income tax purposes. The members, and any other equity owners of a foreign LLC treated as a partnership, are subject to all state and local Tennessee taxes, in the same manner and extent as partners in a foreign partnership. The members and holders of financial rights of a domestic LLC are subject to all state and local Tennessee taxes, in the same manner and extent as partners in a domestic partnership.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1004. Governing law.

Liability of members and others. The liability of a member, holder of financial rights, director, manager, officer, employee, or agent of an LLC formed and existing under this chapter shall at all times be governed by this chapter and the laws of this state.

Conflict with other law. If a conflict arises between the laws of this state and the laws of any other jurisdiction, with regard to the liability of a member, holder of financial rights, director, manager, officer, employee or agent of an LLC for the debts, obligations and liabilities of the LLC, or for the acts or omissions of another member, holder of financial rights, director, manager, officer, employee or agent of the LLC, this chapter and the laws of this state shall govern in determining such liability.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1005. Filing requirements.

Eligibility for filing. The form and filing of a document must satisfy the requirements of this section, and of all other applicable sections or rules that add to these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the secretary of state.

Permitted or required. This chapter requires or permits filing the document with the secretary of state.

Required and permissive information. The document must contain the information required by this chapter or by rule. The document may contain other information as well.

Format. The document must be capable of being printed in ink, in a clear and legible fashion, on one (1) side of letter size paper.

English language. The document must be in the English language. An LLC's or other entity's name need not be in English, if it is written in English letters, or Arabic or Roman numerals, and the certificate of existence, or equivalent document of a foreign entity, need not be in English, if it is accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

Execution. The document must be executed by, or by an authorized representative of, the person submitting the document for filing.

Form of execution. The person executing the document must sign it and state, beneath or opposite the signature, the person's name and the capacity in which the person signs, if other than the person's individual capacity. The document may, but need not, contain:

An attestation by the secretary or an assistant secretary of a corporation;

An acknowledgment, verification, or proof; or

The date the document is signed, except that the date is required for the annual report for the secretary of state.

Mandatory form. If the secretary of state, pursuant to statutory authority, has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, then the document must be in or on the prescribed form.

Delivery to secretary of state. The document must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in the manner and form prescribed by the secretary of state and must be accompanied by the current filing fee and any tax, license fee, interest, or penalty required by this chapter.

Required statement. The document must contain a statement that makes it clear that the document is being filed pursuant to this chapter.

Power to promulgate rules. The secretary of state may promulgate appropriate rules establishing acceptable methods for execution of any document to be filed with the secretary of state.

Verification by commissioner of revenue. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, whenever this chapter requires that an application or other document submitted to the secretary of state for filing be accompanied by a confirmation of good standing, tax clearance for termination, or withdrawal, or other similar communication of taxpayer status by the commissioner of revenue, then the requirement is met, and a paper certificate need not accompany the application or other document, if the commissioner provides to the secretary of state electronic verification of the required information. Upon request of the person seeking certificate information, the commissioner shall provide to the secretary of state electronic verification in lieu of a paper certificate.

Prior law. Any LLC that has not timely filed with the department of revenue such information as required by the commissioner of revenue under prior law, chapter 421, § 1 of the Public Acts of 1997, is subject to administrative dissolution in accordance with the procedures specified in § 48-249-605. The certificate of authority of any foreign LLC that has not timely filed such information with the department is subject to revocation as provided in § 48-249-909. Upon certification by the commissioner of revenue that a domestic LLC or foreign LLC has complied with the information reporting requirements that were required under prior law, the domestic LLC or foreign LLC that has been administratively dissolved, or that has had its certificate of authority revoked for failure to timely file such information, may be reinstated.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, § 47; 2011, ch. 99, § 28; 2020, ch. 719, § 20.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (a), which read: “Eligibility for filing. A document shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section of this chapter, that adds to or varies these requirements, in order to be entitled to filing with the secretary of state.”; in the first sentence of (c), substituted “must contain” for “shall contain” and added “or by rule” at the end; substituted “must be capable of being” for “shall be typewritten or” in (d); substituted “must be” for “shall be” near the beginning of (e) and (f); substituted “must sign” for “shall sign” at the beginning of (g); substituted “the date is required” for “such date shall be required” in (g)(3); substituted “then the document must” for “the document shall” near the end of (h); in (i), substituted “must be” for “shall be” and substituted “in the manner and form prescribed by the secretary of state and must” for “and shall”; substituted “must contain” for “shall contain” in (j); substituted “may promulgate appropriate rules” for “has the power to promulgate appropriate rules and regulations” in (k); in the first sentence of (l), deleted “provision of the” preceding “law”, substituted “the requirement is met” for “such requirement shall be met”; and, in (m), substituted “is subject” for “shall be subject” twice and deleted “has been” preceding “required” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

48-249-1006. Forms and filing methods for annual report and other documents.

Annual report. The secretary of state may prescribe a form and filing method for the annual report. If the secretary of state prescribes a form or filing method for the annual report, then the use of the prescribed form or filing method for the annual report is mandatory.

Other forms. The secretary of state may prescribe forms and filing methods for other documents that are required or permitted to be filed with the secretary of state by this chapter. If the secretary of state prescribes forms or filing methods for other documents that are required or permitted to be filed with the secretary of state by this chapter, then the secretary of state must furnish access to those forms and filing methods on request.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2020, ch. 719, § 21.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote this section, which read: “(a) Annual report. The secretary of state may prescribe a form for the annual report. If the secretary of state prescribes a form for the annual report, the use of the prescribed form for the annual report shall be mandatory, and the secretary of state shall furnish the prescribed form for the annual report on request. “(b) Other forms. The secretary of state may prescribe forms for other documents that are required or permitted to be filed with the secretary of state by this chapter. If the secretary of state prescribes forms for other documents that are required or permitted to be filed with the secretary of state by this chapter, the secretary of state shall furnish the prescribed forms for the other documents on request; however, the use of the prescribed forms for the other documents shall not be mandatory.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

48-249-1007. Filing, service and copying fees.

Filing fees. When the documents described in this chapter are filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall collect the respective fees for such documents, as are specified in this subsection (a). For purposes of this chapter, no document is considered to be filed with the secretary of state unless such document is accompanied by the following fee:

Document Fee

Articles organization As provided in subsection (d)

Certificate of formation $20.00

Certificate of conversion $20.00

Application for reserved name $20.00

Application for use of indistinguishable name $20.00

Notice of transfer or cancellation of reserved name $20.00

Application for or renewal of registered name $20.00

Application for or change, cancellation, or renewal of assumed name $20.00

Statement of change of registered agent, registered office, or both by domestic or foreign LLC $20.00

Statement of change of registered office by registered agent $5.00 per domestic or foreign LLC, but not less than $20.00

Registered agent's statement of resignation $20.00

Articles of amendment $20.00

Restated or amended and restated articles of organization $20.00

Articles of correction $20.00

Certificate of merger $100.00

Statement of abandonment of merger $20.00

Articles of termination by organizers $20.00

Notice of dissolution $20.00

Articles of revocation of dissolution $20.00

Articles of termination $20.00

Certificate of administrative dissolution No fee

Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution $70.00

Articles of termination following administrative dissolution $100

Certificate of reinstatement No fee

Decree of judicial dissolution No fee

Application for certificate of authority As provided in subsection (d)

Application for amendment to certificate of authority $20.00

Certificate of cancellation of certificate of authority $20.00

Certificate of administrative revocation of certificate of authority No fee

Certificate of cancellation of certificate of authority following administrative revocation $100.00

Application for reinstatement following administrative revocation $70.00

Application for certificate of existence or authorization $20.00

Annual report As provided in subsection (d)

Any other document required or permitted by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state $20.00

Fee for Service of Process. The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) each time process is served on the secretary of state under this chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if it prevails in the proceeding.

Fee for copying. The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for copying all filed documents relating to a domestic or foreign LLC. All such copies shall be certified or validated by the secretary of state.

Initial and annual fee. The secretary of state shall collect from each domestic LLC and each foreign LLC that is applying for a certificate of authority or is authorized to transact business in this state, as applicable, an initial filing fee in an amount equal to fifty dollars ($50.00) multiplied by the number of members of the domestic or foreign LLC, as specified in the articles of organization or application for certificate of authority, as applicable, and each year thereafter an annual filing fee in an amount equal to fifty dollars ($50.00) multiplied by the number of members of the domestic or foreign LLC, as specified in the annual report; provided, however, that the amount of each initial filing fee and annual filing fee required under this subsection (d) shall be no less than three hundred dollars ($300), and no more than three thousand dollars ($3,000). Notwithstanding this subsection (d), if the LLC is prohibited by its articles from transacting business in this state, the amount of the initial filing fee or the annual filing fee, as applicable, required under this subsection (d) shall be three hundred dollars ($300) regardless of the number of members of the LLC, as specified in the articles of organization or the annual report; provided, further, that the secretary of state shall collect from each domestic and foreign LLC an additional filing fee of twenty dollars ($20.00), for any annual report that sets forth any change of the registered office or registered agent of the domestic or foreign LLC.

Filing with register of deeds. In addition to the other filing requirements of this chapter, a copy of all documents specified in subdivisions (a)(1) and (12)-(19) shall also be filed in the office of the register of deeds in the county in which an LLC has its principal executive office, if such principal executive office is in this state, and in the case of a merger, in the county in which the surviving LLC or other entity shall have its principal executive office, if such principal executive office is in this state. The register of deeds may charge five dollars ($5.00), plus fifty cents (50¢) per page for each page in excess of five (5) pages, for such filing. Notwithstanding this subsection (e), the failure to file a copy of a document in the office of the register of deeds under this subsection (e) shall not affect the validity or effectiveness of the document.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2010, ch. 742, § 7.

48-249-1008. Correcting filed document.

When permitted. A domestic or foreign LLC, or other person required or permitted by this chapter to file a document, may correct a document filed with the secretary of state, if the document:

Contains an incorrect statement; or

Was defectively executed, attested, sealed, certified, or acknowledged.

Articles of Correction. A document is corrected:

By preparing articles of correction that:

Describe the document, including its filing date, or have attached to the articles of correction a copy of the document;

Specify the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect, or the manner in which the execution, attestation, seal, certification or acknowledgment was defective; and

Correct the incorrect statement or defective execution, attestation, seal, certification or acknowledgment; and

By filing the articles of correction with the secretary of state.

When effective. Articles of correction are effective on the effective time and date of the document they correct, except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1009. Filing duty of secretary of state.

Requirements to complete filing. If the form and filing of a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of § 48-249-1005, and of all other applicable sections or rules that add to these requirements, then the secretary of state must file it.

Procedure. The secretary of state completes the filing of a document by stamping or otherwise endorsing “Filed”, together with the secretary of state's name and official title and the date and time of receipt, on the document. After completing the filing of a document, except for filings pursuant to §§ 48-249-111 and 48-249-1017, the secretary of state shall deliver, in due course, the document, with the filing fee receipt attached, or acknowledgment of receipt if no fee is required, to the domestic or foreign LLC, other person required or permitted by this chapter to file the document, or representative of the domestic or foreign LLC, or other person that delivered the document for filing. A domestic or foreign LLC, other person or representative of the domestic or foreign LLC, or other person may deliver to the office of the secretary of state an exact or conformed copy of the document delivered for filing, together with the document, and, in that event, the secretary of state shall stamp or otherwise endorse the exact or conformed copy “Filed”, together with the secretary of state's name and official title and the date and time of receipt, and immediately return the exact or conformed copy to the person filing the original of the document.

Refusal to file. If the secretary of state refuses to complete the filing of a document, then the secretary of state must return it to the domestic or foreign LLC, other person or representative of the domestic or foreign LLC, or other person that delivered the document for filing immediately after the document was received for filing, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

Effect of filing or refusal to file. The secretary of state's duty to complete the filing of documents under this section is ministerial. The secretary of state's completing the filing or refusing to complete the filing of a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document;

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect; or

Establish that a document purporting to be an exact or conformed copy is in fact an exact or conformed copy.

Conflict with other law. Any document that meets the requirements of this chapter and all applicable rules for filing and recording must be received, filed, or recorded by the appropriate office upon payment of the appropriate fee and taxes, if any, notwithstanding any contrary requirements found in any other laws of this state.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2020, ch. 719, § 22.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “Requirement to complete filing. If a document that is delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of § 48-249-1005, and is accompanied by the required filing fee for the document under § 48-249-1007, the secretary of state shall complete the filing of the document as provided in this section.” in (b), substituted “the domestic” for “such domestic” twice and substituted “the document” for “such document” twice; in (c), substituted “then the secretary of state must” for “the secretary of state shall”, substituted “the domestic” for “such domestic” and substituted “the refusal” for “such refusal”; and, in (e), inserted “and all applicable rules”, substituted “must be” for “shall be”, and deleted “provision of the” preceding “laws” near the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

48-249-1010. Appeal from secretary of state's refusal to complete the filing of a document.

Appeal. If the secretary of state refuses to complete the filing of a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing, the domestic or foreign LLC or other person that delivered the document for filing may appeal the refusal to the chancery court of Davidson County. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel the filing of the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the secretary of state's explanation of the reason for the refusal to complete the filing of the document.

Court-ordered filing. The court may summarily order the secretary of state to file the document or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

Appeal of court decision. The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Standard of review. Any judicial review of the secretary of state's refusal to complete the filing of a document shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1011. Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate attached or certification affixed to a copy of a document filed with the secretary of state, bearing the secretary of state's signature, which may be in facsimile, and the seal of this state, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the secretary of state.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1012. Penalty for signing false document.

Fine. A person commits a Class B misdemeanor, punishable by a fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), if the person signs a document, knowing it to be false in any material respect, with intent that the document be delivered to the office of the secretary of state or other required office for filing.

Nonexclusivity. The offense created by this section is in addition to any other offense created by law for the same conduct.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

48-249-1013. Effective time and date of document.

General. Except as provided in subsection (b) and §§ 48-101-808, 48-249-201, 48-249-702, 48-249-703, 48-249-704, and 48-249-1008(c), a document accepted for filing is effective:

At the time of filing on the date it is filed with the secretary of state, as evidenced by the office of the secretary of state's date and time endorsement on the original document; or

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed with the secretary of state.

Delayed effectiveness. A document may specify a delayed effective time or date. If a document specifies a delayed effective time and date, the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a document specifies a delayed effective date, but does not specify a delayed effective time, the document is effective at the close of business on the date specified. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the ninetieth day after the date it is filed with the secretary of state, except in the case of a certificate of merger filed under § 48-249-702, or a certificate of conversion and the accompanying articles of organization or other formational document, as applicable, filed under §§ 48-101-808, 48-249-703, or 48-249-704. Notwithstanding this subsection (b), documents specified in § 48-249-1007(a)(2), (4), (6), (7), (8), (14), (19), (20), (24), (30) and (33) may not specify a delayed effective time or date.

Requirement for registered agent and office. The secretary of state shall not complete the filing of any articles of organization of a domestic LLC, or application for a certificate of authority of a foreign LLC, unless that document designates the registered agent and registered office of such domestic or foreign LLC in accordance with § 48-249-109. The secretary of state shall not complete the filing of any other document delivered by a domestic or foreign LLC for filing under this chapter if the domestic or foreign LLC does not have a registered agent and registered office designated at the time the document is delivered for filing, unless, at the time the document is received for filing, the secretary of state also receives for filing a statement designating such registered agent or registered office or both, as applicable.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, §§ 52, 53.

48-249-1014. Penalty for transacting business in Tennessee in violation of articles.

In the event an LLC is prohibited from transacting business in this state by its articles but actually transacts business in this state, and, but for § 48-249-1007(d), the LLC would have paid a larger initial or annual filing fee under § 48-249-1007(d), the LLC shall be fined an amount equal to three (3) times the initial or annual filing fee, less the amount actually paid, for each year, or part of each year, in which it actually transacts business in this state.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1015. Powers.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the secretary of state by this chapter, including, but not limited to, the power to promulgate necessary and appropriate rules and regulations consistent with this chapter and the power to destroy any records in the secretary of state's office concerning a domestic or foreign LLC ten (10) years after such domestic or foreign LLC has terminated, withdrawn from this state or had its certificate of authority revoked.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1016. Deputies of secretary of state.

An act of a duly authorized deputy of the secretary of state in the secretary of state's behalf under this chapter is the equivalent of the act of the secretary of state; provided, that the deputy signs the name of the secretary of state by such deputy as deputy.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1017. Annual report for secretary of state.

Required contents. Each domestic LLC and each foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this state shall file with the secretary of state an annual report that sets forth the following:

The name of the domestic or foreign LLC and the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is formed;

The street address and zip code of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at that office in this state;

The street address, including the zip code, of its principal executive office (and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal executive office);

If the domestic or foreign LLC is a director-managed LLC or a manager-managed LLC, or its equivalent, the names and business addresses, including the zip code, of its directors or managers, or their equivalents, as applicable;

The names and business addresses, including the zip code, of its officers, or their equivalents, if any;

The federal employer identification number (FEIN) of the domestic or foreign LLC, or if such number has not been obtained, a representation that it has been applied for; and

If the domestic or foreign LLC will have more than six (6) members as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the domestic or foreign LLC, the number of members of the domestic or foreign LLC as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the domestic or foreign LLC.

Information to be current. Information in the annual report shall be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the domestic or foreign LLC. An annual report of a domestic LLC that sets forth a change of the principal executive office of the domestic LLC shall be deemed to be an amendment to the articles of organization of the domestic LLC, and the domestic LLC shall not be required to take any further action to amend the articles of organization of the domestic LLC under § 48-249-204(a) with respect to such amendment. An annual report of a foreign LLC that sets forth a change of the principal executive office of the foreign LLC shall be deemed to be an amendment to the certificate of authority of the foreign LLC, and the foreign LLC shall not be required to take any further action to amend the certificate of authority of the foreign LLC under § 48-249-906 with respect to such amendment. An annual report of a domestic or foreign LLC that sets forth a change of the registered office or registered agent of the domestic or foreign LLC shall be deemed to be a statement of change for purposes of § 48-249-110(a), and the domestic or foreign LLC shall not be required to take any further action under § 48-249-110(a) with respect to such change.

Filing date. Each domestic LLC and each foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this state shall file the annual report with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the fourth month following the end of the close of the domestic or foreign LLC's fiscal year or upon a date set by rule by the secretary of state.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2014, ch. 783, § 16; 2020, ch. 719, § 23.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added “or upon a date set by rule by the secretary of state” at the end of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

48-249-1018. Construction.

No strict construction. The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this chapter.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-1019. Certificate of existence.

Any person may apply to the secretary of state to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic LLC or a certificate of authorization for a foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this state.

A certificate of existence or authorization sets forth:

The domestic LLC's name or the foreign LLC's name used in this state;

That:

The domestic LLC is a limited liability company formed under the laws of this state, the effective date of its initial filing, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual; or

The foreign LLC is authorized to transact business in this state;

That all fees, taxes and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if:

Payment is reflected in the records of the secretary of state or the department of revenue; and

Nonpayment allows:

Administrative dissolution of a domestic LLC; or

Administrative revocation of the certificate of authority of a foreign LLC;

That its most recent annual report required by § 48-249-1017 has been filed with the secretary of state;

For a domestic LLC:

That articles of termination have not been filed and a decree of termination has not been filed; and

Whether or not a notice of dissolution, certificate of dissolution or decree of dissolution has been filed and remains effective;

For a foreign LLC:

That a certificate of cancellation of certificate of authority has not been filed; and

Whether or not a certificate of revocation of certificate of authority has been filed and remains effective;

That the certificate of existence or authorization is effective as of the date of the issuance of the certificate; and

Other facts of record in the office of the secretary of state that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualifications stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or authorization issued by the secretary of state may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign LLC is in existence or is authorized to transact business in this state and is in good standing.

Acts 2010, ch. 742, § 6.